zh-TW: 汽車揚聲器安裝類型: 訂製安裝; 嵌入式安裝; OEM 替換 (原廠位置); 面板安裝; 表面安裝; 其他
en: Motor vehicle speaker mounting type: Custom installation; Flush mount; OEM replacement (factory location); Panel mount; Surface mount; Other
hr-HR: Vrsta montaže zvučnika u motornom vozilu: Prilagođena instalacija; Ugradbena montaža; OEM zamjena (tvornička lokacija); Montaža na ploču; Površinska montaža; Ostalo
lt-LT: Motorinės transporto priemonės garsiakalbio montavimo tipas: Individualus montavimas; Įleidžiamas montavimas; OEM pakaitalas (gamyklinė vieta); Montavimas skydelyje; Paviršinis montavimas; Kita
pl: Typ montażu głośnika w pojeździe silnikowym: Instalacja niestandardowa; Montaż wpuszczany; Zamiennik OEM (miejsce fabryczne); Montaż panelowy; Montaż nawierzchniowy; Inne
zh-CN: 机动车扬声器安装类型: 定制安装; 嵌入式安装; OEM 替换件（原厂位置）; 面板安装; 表面安装; 其他
el: Τύπος τοποθέτησης ηχείου μηχανοκίνητου οχήματος: Εξατομικευμένη εγκατάσταση; Χωνευτή τοποθέτηση; Αντικατάσταση OEM (εργοστασιακή τοποθεσία); Τοποθέτηση σε πάνελ; Επιφανειακή τοποθέτηση; Άλλο
da: Monteringstype for højttaler i motorkøretøj: Specialmontering; Planmontering; OEM-udskiftning (fabriksplacering); Panelmontering; Overflademontering; Andet
sk-SK: Spôsob upevnenia reproduktora v motorovom vozidle: Vlastná inštalácia; Zapustená montáž; Náhrada OEM (z výroby); Montáž na panel; Povrchová montáž; Iné
ro-RO: Tip de montare a difuzorului pentru vehicule: Instalare personalizată; Montaj încastrat; Înlocuire OEM (locație din fabrică); Montaj pe panou; Montaj la suprafață; Altele
cs: Typ montáže reproduktoru motorového vozidla: Vlastní instalace; Zapuštěná montáž; OEM náhrada (tovární umístění); Montáž na panel; Povrchová montáž; Jiné
th: ประเภทการติดตั้งลำโพงในรถยนต์: การติดตั้งแบบกำหนดเอง; การติดตั้งแบบฝังเรียบ; การแทนที่ OEM (ตำแหน่งติดตั้งจากโรงงาน); การติดตั้งบนแผง; การติดตั้งแบบยึดพื้นผิว; อื่นๆ
hu: Gépjármű-hangszóró rögzítési típusa: Egyedi telepítés; Süllyesztett rögzítés; Gyári (OEM) csere (eredeti helyre); Panelbe építhető; Felületre szerelhető; Egyéb
pt-BR: Veículo automotor alto-falante tipo de instalação: Instalação personalizada; Embutido; Substituição OEM (local de fábrica); Montagem em painel; Montagem em superfície; Outros
sl-SI: Vrsta montaže zvočnika motornega vozila: Namestitev po meri; Poravnana namestitev; Nadomestno OEM (tovarniška lokacija); Namestitev na ploščo; Nadometna namestitev; Drugo
ja: 自動車用スピーカー取り付けタイプ: カスタム取り付け; フラッシュマウント; OEM交換用 (純正位置); パネルマウント; サーフェスマウント; その他
fi: Moottoriajoneuvon kaiuttimen kiinnitystyyppi: Mukautettu asennus; Uppoasennus; OEM-varaosa (tehdaspaikka); Paneeliasennus; Pinta-asennus; Muu
ko: 차량용 스피커 장착 유형: 맞춤형 설치; 플러시 마운트; OEM 교체(공장 위치); 패널 마운트; 서페이스 마운트; 기타
nl: Motorvoertuig luidspreker montagetype: Aangepaste installatie; Verzonken montage; OEM-vervanging (fabriekslocatie); Paneelmontage; Opbouwmontage; Overig
tr: Motorlu taşıt hoparlör montaj tipi: Özel montaj; Gömme montaj; OEM değişimi (fabrika konumu); Panel montajı; Yüzey montajı; Diğer
nb: Monteringstype for høyttaler i motorkjøretøy: Spesialtilpasset montering; Planmontert; OEM-erstatning (fabrikkplassering); Panelmontert; Utenpåliggende montering; Annet
pt-PT: tipo de montagem de altifalante para veículos automóveis: Instalação personalizada; Montagem embutida; Substituição de OEM (local de fábrica); Montagem em painel; Montagem em superfície; Outro
it: Tipo di montaggio degli altoparlanti per autoveicoli: Installazione personalizzata; Montaggio a filo; Ricambio OEM (posizione di fabbrica); Montaggio a pannello; Montaggio in superficie; Altro
vi: Loại giá đỡ loa xe cơ giới: Lắp đặt tùy chỉnh; Gắn chìm; Thay thế OEM (vị trí nguyên bản); Gắn trên bảng điều khiển; Gắn nổi; Khác
fr: Type de montage du haut-parleur du véhicule: Installation personnalisée; Montage encastré; Remplacement OEM (emplacement d’origine); Montage sur panneau; Montage en surface; Autre
sv: Monteringstyp för högtalare i motorfordon: Anpassad installation; Infälld montering; OEM-ersättning (fabriksplats); Panelmontering; Ytmontering; Övrigt
de: Montageart des Kfz-Lautsprechers: Individuelle Installation; Bündige Montage; OEM-Ersatz (Werksposition); Blendenmontage; Aufbaumontage; Sonstige
ru: Тип крепления автомобильного динамика: Индивидуальная установка; Установка заподлицо; Замена OEM (штатное место); Крепление на панель; Накладной монтаж; Другое
es: Tipo de montaje de altavoz para vehículos: Instalación personalizada; Montaje al ras; Repuesto de fabricante de equipo original (ubicación de fábrica); Montaje en panel; Montaje en superficie; Otro
bg-BG: Тип монтаж на говорител за моторно превозно средство: Монтаж по поръчка; Монтаж на нивото на повърхността; OEM заместител (фабрично място); Монтаж на панел; Повърхностен монтаж; Друго